Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-235
Appeal; procedure.

Any licensee, considering himself or herself aggrieved by any action of the board taken pursuant to the Barber Act may appeal the action of the board, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 8, p. 557;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 32, p. 1328;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 120.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.